test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ava_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ӓвӓ: # Noun 'mother'
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Nom: ӓвӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Gen: ӓвӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Acc: ӓвӓм
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Com: ӓвӓге
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Dat: ӓвӓлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ine: ӓвӓштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ill: [ӓвӓшкӹ, ӓвӓш]
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Lat: ӓвӓэш
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Cmpr: ӓвӓлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Abe: ӓвӓде
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Nom: ӓвӓвлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Gen: ӓвӓвлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Acc: ӓвӓвлӓм
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Com: ӓвӓвлӓге
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Dat: ӓвӓвлӓлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Ine: ӓвӓвлӓштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Ill: [ӓвӓвлӓшкӹ, ӓвӓвлӓш]
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Lat: ӓвӓвлӓэш
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Cmpr: ӓвӓвлӓлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Abe: ӓвӓвлӓде

     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/CP: [ӓвӓм, ӓвӓэм] # х2 ӓвӓэмжӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+So/PC: ӓвӓмӹн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+So/PC: ӓвӓмӹм
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+So/PC: ӓвӓмге
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+So/PC: ӓвӓмлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1+So/PC: ӓвӓмӹштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+So/PC: ӓвӓмӹшкӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1+So/PC: ӓвӓмӹш
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PC: ӓвӓмлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1+So/PC: ӓвӓмде
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/PNC: [ӓвӓмвлӓ, ӓвӓэмвлӓ] # х3
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+So/NCP: ӓвӓвлӓэм
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӓвӓмвлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӓвӓмвлӓм
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӓвӓмвлӓге
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӓвӓмвлӓлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӓвӓмвлӓштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӓвӓмвлӓшкӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӓвӓмвлӓш
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӓвӓмвлӓлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1+So/PNC: ӓвӓмвлӓде

     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+So/PC: [ӓвӓт, ӓвӓэт]
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+So/PC: ӓвӓтӹн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2+So/PC: ӓвӓтӹм
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2+So/PC: ӓвӓтге
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2+So/PC: ӓвӓтлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2+So/PC: ӓвӓтӹштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+So/PC: ӓвӓтӹшкӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg2+So/PC: ӓвӓтӹш
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2+So/PC: ӓвӓтлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2+So/PC: ӓвӓтде
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+So/PNC: [ӓвӓтвлӓ, ӓвӓэтвлӓ] 
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+So/NCP: ӓвӓвлӓэт
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+So/PNC: ӓвӓтвлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2+So/PNC: ӓвӓтвлӓм
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2+So/PNC: ӓвӓтвлӓге
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2+So/PNC: ӓвӓтвлӓлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2+So/NCP: ӓвӓвлӓлӓнет
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2+So/PNC: ӓвӓтвлӓштӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2+So/PNC: ӓвӓтвлӓшкӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg2+So/PNC: ӓвӓтвлӓэш
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2+So/PNC: ӓвӓтвлӓлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2+So/PNC: ӓвӓтвлӓде

     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+So/PC: ӓвӓжӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+So/PC: ӓвӓжӹн
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+So/PC: ӓвӓжӹм
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3+So/PC: ӓвӓжӹге 
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+So/PC: ӓвӓжӹлӓн 
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3+So/PC: ӓвӓжӹштӹ #??
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3+So/PC: ӓвӓжӹшкӹ #??
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3+So/CP: ӓвӓшкӹжӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg3+So/CP: ӓвӓэшӹжӹ #
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3+So/PC: ӓвӓжӹлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3+So/PC: ӓвӓжӹде
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+So/PNC: ӓвӓжӹвлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+So/NCP: ӓвӓвлӓжӹ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+So/PNC: ӓвӓжӹвлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3+So/PNC: ӓвӓжӹвлӓм
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3+So/PNC: ӓвӓжӹвлӓге
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+So/PNC: ӓвӓжӹвлӓлӓн
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3+So/PNC: ӓвӓжӹвлӓштӹ #??
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3+So/PNC: ӓвӓжӹвлӓшкӹ #??
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg3+So/PNC: ӓвӓжӹвлӓш #??
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3+So/PNC: ӓвӓжӹвлӓлӓ
     ӓвӓ+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3+So/PNC: ӓвӓжӹвлӓде


#ӓвӓт, ӓвӓэт, ӓвӓэтшӹ, 
#ӓвӓжӹ, 
